Hawaii statutes.
§576B-102 Definitions. In this
chapter:

"Child" means an individual, whether
over or under the age of majority, who is or is alleged to be owed a duty of
support by the individual's parent or who is or is alleged to be the
beneficiary of a support order directed to the parent.

"Child support order" means a support
order for a child, including a child who has attained the age of majority under
the law of the issuing state or foreign country.

"Convention" means the Convention on
the International Recovery of Child Support and Other Forms of Family
Maintenance, concluded at The Hague on November 23, 2007.

"Duty of support" means an obligation
imposed or imposable by law to provide support for a child, spouse, or former
spouse, including an unsatisfied obligation to provide support.

"Foreign country" means a country,
including a political subdivision thereof, other than the United States, that
authorizes the issuance of support orders and:

(1) That has been declared under the law of the
United States to be a foreign reciprocating country;

(2) That has established a reciprocal agreement for
child support with this State as provided in section 576B‑308;

(3) That has enacted a law or established procedures
for the issuance and enforcement of support orders that are substantially
similar to the procedures under this chapter; or

(4) In which the Convention is in force with respect
to the United States.

"Foreign support order" means a
support order of a foreign tribunal.

"Foreign tribunal" means a court, administrative
agency, or quasi-judicial entity of a foreign country that is authorized to
establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage of a
child. This term includes a competent authority under the Convention.

"Home state" means the state or
foreign country in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as
parent for at least six consecutive months immediately preceding the time of
filing of a petition or comparable pleading for support and, if a child is less
than six months old, the state or foreign country in which the child lived from
birth with any of them. A period of temporary absence of any of them is
counted as part of the six-month or other period.

"Income" includes earnings or other
periodic entitlements to money from any source and any other property subject
to withholding for support under the law of this State.

"Income withholding order" means an
order or other legal process directed to an obligor's employer as defined by
sections 571-52, 571-52.2, 571-52.3, 576D-14, and 576E-16, to withhold support
from the income of the obligor.

"Initiating tribunal" means the
tribunal of a state or foreign country from which a petition or comparable
pleading is forwarded or in which a petition or comparable pleading is filed
for forwarding to another state or foreign country.

"Issuing foreign country" means the
foreign country in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment
determining parentage of a child.

"Issuing state" means the state in
which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of
a child.

"Issuing tribunal" means the tribunal
of a state or foreign country that issues a support order or a judgment
determining parentage of a child.

"Law" includes decisional and
statutory law and rules and regulations having the force of law.

"Obligee" means:

(1) An individual to whom a duty of support is or is
alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support order or a judgment determining
parentage of a child has been issued;

(2) A foreign country, state, or political
subdivision of a state to which the rights under a duty of support or support
order have been assigned or which has independent claims based on financial
assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support;

(3) An individual seeking a judgment determining
parentage of the individual's child; or

(4) A person that is a creditor in a proceeding under
Article 7.

"Obligor" means an individual, or the
estate of a decedent that:

(1) Owes or is alleged to owe a duty of support;

(2) Is alleged but has not been adjudicated to be a
parent of a child;

(3) Is liable under a support order; or

(4) Is a debtor in a proceeding under Article 7.

"Outside this State" means a location
in another state or a country other than the United States, whether or not the
country is a foreign country.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial
entity.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or stored in an electronic or other medium and
retrievable in a perceivable form.

"Register" means to file in the
family court of this State a support order or judgment determining parentage of
a child issued in another state or a foreign country.

"Registering tribunal" means a
tribunal of the state in which a support order or judgment determining parentage
of a child is registered. The support enforcement agency of this State is the
registering tribunal for the receipt and processing of all registration
requests from another support enforcement agency or an individual who has
applied for support enforcement agency services. The family court is the
registering tribunal for all other requests for registration.

"Responding state" means a state in
which a petition or comparable pleading for support or to determine parentage
of a child is filed or to which a petition or comparable pleading is forwarded
for filing from another state or foreign country.

"Responding tribunal" means the
authorized tribunal in a responding state or foreign country.

"Spousal support order" means a
support order for a spouse or former spouse of the obligor.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, or any territory or insular possession under the jurisdiction of the
United States. The term includes an Indian nation or tribe.

"Support enforcement agency" means a
public official, governmental entity, or private agency authorized to:

(1) Seek enforcement of support orders or laws
relating to the duty of support;

(2) Seek establishment or modification of child
support;

(3) Request determination of parentage of a child;

(4) Attempt to locate obligors or their assets; or

(5) Request determination of the controlling child
support order.

"Support order" means a judgment,
decree, order, decision, or directive, whether temporary, final, or subject to
modification, issued in a state or foreign country for the benefit of a child,
a spouse, or a former spouse, which provides for monetary support, health care,
arrearages, retroactive support, or reimbursement for financial assistance
provided to an individual obligee in place of child support. The term may
include related costs and fees, interest, income withholding, automatic
adjustment, reasonable attorney's fees, and other relief.

"Tribunal" means a court, administrative
agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify
support orders or to determine parentage of a child. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1;
am L 2000, c 194, §3; am L 2001, c 48, §1; ren and am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Note

Section was former §576B-101.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next